Maine, session 132, LD1369.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §12724 is enacted to read:
§12724. Emergency medical services training
By September 1, 2026, the system shall develop and offer one or more courses in
emergency medical services training for emergency medical services persons under Title
32, chapter 2-B. The training required under this section must be comprehensive, accessible
and provided at no cost to participants.
1. Training and licensing requirements. The training provided under this section
must:
A. Provide training for basic and advanced emergency medical treatment under Title
32, chapter 2-B;
B. Meet or exceed state standards for licensing required under Title 32, chapter 2-B
and national standards;
C. Be offered in formats that maximize accessibility, including in-person, online and
hybrid formats; and
D. Be provided at no cost to participants.
2. Degree programs. The system shall study the development of providing one or
more accredited degree programs in emergency medical services. A degree program under
this subsection must be provided at no cost to participants.
3. Collaboration. The system shall collaborate with the Emergency Medical Services'
Board established in Title 5, section 12004-A, subsection 15 and other appropriate state
agencies, local governments and private sector stakeholders in the development of training
and courses under this section and to obtain or leverage grants, donations of funds or
equipment and partnerships in carrying out the purposes of this section.
4. Rules. The system shall adopt rules to carry out the purposes of this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules under the Title 5, chapter
375, subchapter 2-A; and
5. Report. Beginning January 1, 2027 and every year thereafter, the system shall
submit a report detailing:
A. The number of participants enrolled in training or courses implemented under this
section;
B. The ratio of participants who have completed training or courses and received
licenses under this section;
C. The impact of the implementation of this section on the provision of emergency
medical services in the State; and
D. Any challenges, recommendations or recommended legislation regarding the
training and courses required by this section.
The system shall submit the report under this subsection along with any recommended
legislation to the joint standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over
Page 1 - 132LR0857(01)

410 education and cultural affairs. The committee may report out legislation to the Legislature
421 based upon the report.
Sec. 2. Funding. The Maine Community College system shall carry out the purposes
of section 1 within the system's existing budgetary resources.